Massachusetts, session 194th, H1668.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The fourth paragraph of subsection (b) of section 3 of chapter 188 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in
line 22, the words "or minor children;" and inserting in place thereof the following:- ", minor or
adult children;".
of 1